South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3281.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 3, Title 23 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Article 18 Fallen First Responder Survivor Advocate Section 23-3-1600. (A) The Fallen First Responder Survivor Advocate position is created within the State Law Enforcement Division (SLED). SLED shall employ only one full-time person who shall issue a report to the General Assembly after one full year as to whether an administrative assistant is needed to fulfill the mandates of this article. (B) The Fallen First Responder Survivor Advocate must possess a four-year college degree, with at least four years of experience in insurance claims, consumer advocacy, benefits, dispute resolution, legal or similar work, and shall receive pay commensurate with qualifications and experience. (C) As contained in this article: (1) "Survivor" means a spouse, child, immediate family member, dependent and other persons, who may be entitled to benefits that may accrue to them because of the death of a fallen first responder. (2) "Fallen first responder" means a law enforcement officer, firefighter, corrections officer, and emergency medical technician personnel who volunteers for or are employed by the State of South Carolina or any political subdivision of the State of South Carolina or who volunteers for and is employed by any combination of these governmental entities, who is killed in the line of duty or who is injured in the line of duty and death results from an injury sustained in the line of duty. (D) In cases of doubt, the definitions contained in subsection (C) must be construed liberally to include all types of first responders who sacrificed their lives for our State and their loved ones. Section 23-3-1610. The Fallen First Responder Survivor Advocate shall immediately notify survivors of fallen first responders of the availability of an advocate to advise and assist them regarding any and all issues that arise as a result of the death of their family member to include, but not be limited to: (1) mental health counseling; (2) life insurance; (3) health insurance; (4) special death benefits; (5) workers' compensation benefits; (6) educational benefits; (7) social security and other federal benefits; (8) state property tax exemptions; and (9) any other assistance the advocate or the survivor identifies. Such assistance shall continue, as needed, for the life of the survivors and shall be retroactively applied to current survivors. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor and is contingent upon funding by the General Assembly. ----XX----